Utah statutes.
53B-24-303.   Duties of council.

The council shall:

(1)  submit an application in accordance with federal law for a demonstration project to the Health Care Financing Administration before December 31, 1997, for the purpose of receiving and disbursing federal funds for direct and indirect graduate medical education expenses;

(2)  seek private and public contributions for the program;

(3)  study and recommend options for financing graduate medical education to the State Board of Regents and the Legislature;

(4)  advise the State Board of Regents and the Legislature on the status and needs of health care professionals in training;

(5)  determine the method for reimbursing institutions that sponsor health care professionals in training;

(6)  determine the number and type of positions for health care professionals in training for which program money may be used; and

(7)  distribute program money for graduate medical education in a manner that:

(a)  prepares postgraduate medical residents, as defined by the accreditation council on graduate medical education, for inpatient, outpatient, hospital, community, and geographically diverse settings;

(b)  encourages the coordination of interdisciplinary clinical training among health care professionals in training;

(c)  promotes stable funding for the clinical training of health care professionals in training; and

(d)  only funds accredited clinical training programs.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 28, 2013 General Session

